Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1942.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Surveillance Pricing Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250HB1942PN2451 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Electronic surveillance technology." A technological method or system of surveillance used to observe, monitor or collect information related to a person, including the following:(1) Actions, habits, race, religion, residence, sexuality or preferences.(2) Interests, including the individual's political, personal or professional affiliation.(3) Web-browsing history, purchase history, financial circumstances or consumer behaviors.(4) Personally identifiable information."Person." A natural person or an entity, including, but not limited to, a corporation, partnership, association, trust, limited liability company, cooperative or other organization."Personally identifiable information." The term shall have the same meaning as "personal information" as defined in section 2 of the act of December 22, 2005 (P.L.474, No.94), known as the Breach of Personal Information Notification Act."Surveillance pricing." Offering or setting a customized price for a good or service for a specific consumer or group of consumers based, in whole or in part, on personally identifiable information collected through electronic surveillance technology. The term includes the use of technological methods, systems or tools, including, but not limited to:(1) Sensors.(2) Cameras.(3) Device tracking.(4) Biometric monitoring.(5) Other forms of observation or data collection that are capable of gathering personally identifiable information about:20250HB1942PN2451 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A consumer's behavior and characteristics.(ii) The location or other personal attributes of a consumer, whether in physical or digital environments.Section 3. Prohibition on surveillance pricing.(a) Prohibition.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a person shall not engage in surveillance pricing.(b) Exception.--A person does not engage in surveillance pricing if any of the following apply:(1) The difference in price is based solely on costs associated with providing the good or service to different consumers.(2) A discounted price is offered based on publicly disclosed eligibility criteria, including, but not limited to:(i) signing up for a mailing list;(ii) registering for promotional communications; or(iii) participating in a promotional event.(3) A discounted price is offered to members of a broadly defined group based on publicly disclosed eligibility criteria, including, but not limited to:(i) teachers;(ii) active or retired military;(iii) senior citizens;(iv) students; or(v) residents of a certain area.(4) A discounted price is offered through a loyalty, membership or rewards program that consumers affirmatively purchase or enroll in, based on publicly disclosed eligibility criteria.(5) The person operates as an insurer as defined in 40 20250HB1942PN2451 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pa.C.S. § 4502 (relating to definitions) and the pricing is in connection with the activity.(c) Consumer report.--A person is not in violation of this act if the information used in surveillance pricing is based on information contained in a consumer report as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(d) (relating to definitions; rules of construction) or a commercial credit report, and the use relates to:(1) the pricing or specific terms for extending credit;(2) entering into a transaction with a specific consumer; or(3) a specific commercial enterprise.(d) Requirements.--A discounted price or reward offered under subsection (b)(2), (3), (4) or (5) that collects personally identifiable information shall:(1) Clearly and conspicuously disclose any eligibility criteria, available discounts and conditions for receiving or earning the discount or reward before any personally identifiable information is collected.(2) Be uniformly offered or made available to all consumers who meet the disclosed eligibility criteria.(3) Not be augmented or supplemented by personally identifiable information obtained from a third party or other means.(e) Personal information.--Any personally identifiable information collected under subsection (b) shall be used solely for the purpose of offering or administering the applicable discount, cost-based pricing or loyalty program and shall not be used for any other purpose, including profiling or individualized price setting.20250HB1942PN2451 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Construction.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to allow any insurance company to engage in conduct that violates any provision of 40 Pa.C.S. (relating to insurance).Section 4. Penalties.(a) Actions.--Except as provided under subsection (b), actions under this act may only be brought by the Attorney General or a district attorney as follows:(1) In addition to any other remedy at law, a person that violates this act shall be liable for the following civil penalties, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought under this subsection:(i) A civil penalty not to exceed $12,500 for each violation, with each violation of this act constituting a separate violation with respect to each consumer or transaction involved.(ii) For an intentional violation of this act, a civil penalty no greater than three times the amount of the penalty assessed under subparagraph (i) in addition to all revenues earned from the violation.(2) A prevailing plaintiff in an action brought under this section shall be awarded reasonable attorney fees and applicable court costs.(3) In addition to seeking civil penalties and other monetary relief, a court may award injunctive or declaratory relief as necessary to enforce this act and to remedy any violation of law.(b) Civil action by consumer.--A consumer may bring an action for injunctive relief as necessary to enforce this act and to remedy any violation of law. A prevailing plaintiff in an action brought under this subsection shall be awarded reasonable 20250HB1942PN2451 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attorney fees and applicable court costs.Section 5. Waiver.Any waiver of this act is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.Section 6. Interaction with other laws.The rights, remedies and penalties established by this act are cumulative and shall not be construed to supersede the rights, remedies or penalties established under other laws, including, but not limited to, the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1942PN2451 - 8 - 12345678910111213